Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Chapter 17. Child Protection.
Sec. 47.17.290.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“athletic coach” means

a paid leader or assistant of a sports team; or

a volunteer leader or assistant of a sports team who volunteers as a leader or assistant of a sports team for more than four hours a week;

“child” means a person under 18 years of age;

“child abuse or neglect” means the physical injury or neglect, mental injury, sexual abuse, sexual exploitation, or maltreatment of a child under the age of 18 by a person under circumstances that indicate that the child’s health or welfare is harmed or threatened thereby; in this paragraph, “mental injury” means an injury to the emotional well-being, or intellectual or psychological capacity of a child, as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment in the child’s ability to function;

“child care provider” means an adult individual, including a foster parent or an employee of an organization, who provides care and supervision to a child for compensation or reimbursement;

“criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“immediately” means as soon as is reasonably possible, and no later than 24 hours;

“institution” means a private or public hospital or other facility providing medical diagnosis, treatment, or care;

“maltreatment” means an act or omission that results in circumstances in which there is reasonable cause to suspect that a child may be a child in need of aid, as described in AS

47.10.011

, except that, for purposes of this chapter, the act or omission need not have been committed by the child’s parent, custodian, or guardian;

“mental injury” means a serious injury to the child as evidenced by an observable and substantial impairment in the child’s ability to function in a developmentally appropriate manner and the existence of that impairment is supported by the opinion of a qualified expert witness;

“neglect” means the failure by a person responsible for the child’s welfare to provide necessary food, care, clothing, shelter, or medical attention for a child;

“organization” means a group or entity that provides care and supervision for compensation to a child not related to the caregiver, and includes a child care facility, pre-elementary school, head start center, child foster home, residential child care facility, recreation program, children’s camp, and children’s club;

“person responsible for the child’s welfare” means the child’s parent, guardian, foster parent, a person responsible for the child’s care at the time of the alleged child abuse or neglect, or a person responsible for the child’s welfare in a public or private residential agency or institution;

“practitioner of the healing arts” includes athletic trainers, chiropractors, mental health counselors, social workers, dental hygienists, dentists, health aides, nurses, nurse practitioners, certified nurse aides, occupational therapists, occupational therapy assistants, optometrists, osteopaths, naturopaths, physical therapists, physical therapy assistants, physicians, physician’s assistants, psychiatrists, psychologists, psychological associates, audiologists and speech-language pathologists licensed under AS 08.11, hearing aid dealers licensed under AS 08.55, marital and family therapists licensed under AS 08.63, behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts, religious healing practitioners, acupuncturists, and surgeons;

“reasonable cause to suspect” means cause, based on all the facts and circumstances known to the person, that would lead a reasonable person to believe that something might be the case;

“school district” means a city or borough school district or regional educational attendance area;

“sex offense” has the meaning given in AS

12.63.100

;

“sexual exploitation” includes

allowing, permitting, or encouraging a child to engage in prostitution prohibited by AS

11.66.100

—

11.66.150

, by a person responsible for the child’s welfare;

allowing, permitting, encouraging, or engaging in activity prohibited by AS

11.41.455(a)

, by a person responsible for the child’s welfare.

History.

(§ 1 ch 100 SLA 1971; am § 6 ch 104 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 222 SLA 1976; am §§ 56, 57 ch 94 SLA 1980; am §§ 8, 9 ch 104 SLA 1982; am §§ 15, 16 ch 39 SLA 1985; am § 8 ch 56 SLA 1986; am § 3 ch 114 SLA 1986; am § 14 ch 131 SLA 1986; am § 31 ch 2 FSSLA 1987; am § 14 ch 6 SLA 1990; am § 5 ch 29 SLA 1990; am §§ 15 — 19 ch 205 SLA 1990; am § 9 ch 129 SLA 1992; am § 48 ch 59 SLA 1996; am § 12 ch 2 SLA 1998; am §§ 62, 63 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 25 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 22 ch 42 SLA 2000; am § 40 ch 43 SLA 2013; am § 4 ch 36 SLA 2014; am § 5 ch 41 SLA 2014; am § 24 ch 2 SSSLA 2015; am § 134 ch 4 FSSLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Formerly
AS

47.17.070

. Renumbered in 1990. Reorganized in 1985, 1990, 2013, and 2019 to alphabetize the terms defined.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added the definition of “athletic coach”.

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, in (14), inserted “athletic trainers,” following “includes”.

The second 2014 amendment, effective September 16, 2014, in (14), inserted “behavior analysts, assistant behavior analysts,” following “marital and family therapists licensed under AS 08.63”.

The 2015 amendment, effective June 30, 2017, rewrote (1), which read, “ ‘athletic coach’ includes a paid leader or assistant of a sports team;”.

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, added (18) [now (17).

Editor's notes. —

Section 79(b), ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides that the 1998 amendments to paragraphs (8) and (9) apply to “(1) a case or proceeding that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998;

“(2) an action taken under AS 47.10, AS 47.12, AS 47.17, or AS 47.35 on or after September 14, 1998; and

“(3) a motion that is filed with the court on or after September 14, 1998 in a case or proceeding that was pending in the court before September 14, 1998.”

Subsection (c) of § 79,
ch. 99, SLA 1998 provides as follows: “The provisions of (b) of this section do not preclude consideration of evidence of conduct or omission of a person that brings a child under the jurisdiction of
AS 47.10 or
AS 47.12.”

AS 47.35 was repealed in 2005.